Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB295.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 211(a) introductory paragraph of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, amended July 8, 2024 (P.L.527, No.47), is amended to read:Section 211. Revocation or refusal of kennel licenses.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (a) General powers of secretary.--The secretary shall revoke a kennel license, dealer license or out-of-state dealer license if a licensee is convicted of a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 3129 (relating to sexual intercourse with animal), 5532 (relating to neglect of animal) if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5533 (relating to cruelty to animal) if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5534 (relating to aggravated cruelty to animal), 5535 (relating to attack of service, guide or support dog), 5542 (relating to animal mutilation and related offenses) if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5543 (relating to animal fighting), 5544 (relating to possession of animal fighting paraphernalia), 5548 (relating to police animals) or 5549 (relating to assault with a biological agent on animal, fowl or honey bees) or of substantially similar conduct pursuant to 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) , 18 U.S.C. § 48 (relating to animal crushing) or a cruelty law of another state. The secretary shall not issue a kennel license, dealer license or out-of-state dealer license to a person that has been convicted of a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 3129, 5532 if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5533 if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5534, 5535, 5542 if graded as a misdemeanor or higher, 5543, 5544, 5548 or 5549 within the last ten years. The secretary may revoke or refuse to issue a kennel license, dealer license or out-of-state dealer license for any one or more of the following reasons:* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 222. Prohibition on sale of dogs bred by certain persons.Notwithstanding the provisions of section 908, a dealer or 20250HB0295PN0239 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 kennel may not sell or offer for sale, including a sale for research purposes, a dog bred by a person who has received any of the following from the United States Department of Agriculture as authorized under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) and its attendant regulations : (1) A citation for a direct or critical violation or citations for three or more indirect or noncritical violations during the two-year period before the procurement of the dog.(2) Two consecutive citations for no access to a housing facility before the procurement of the dog.Section 909. Whistleblower protection. An employee of a business, nonprofit entity or government entity subject to this act shall be deemed to be an employee under the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this act or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals) . A business, nonprofit entity or government entity subject to this act shall be deemed to be an employer under the Whistleblower Law with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this act or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 . Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0295PN0239 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324